Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.020

Hearing instruments—Dispensing—License, certificate, permit required.

(1) No person shall engage in the fitting and dispensing of hearing instruments or imply or represent that he or she is engaged in the fitting and dispensing of hearing instruments unless he or she is a licensed hearing aid specialist, or a licensed audiologist or holds an interim permit issued by the department as provided in this chapter and is an owner or employee of an establishment that is bonded as provided by RCW 18.35.240. The owner or manager of an establishment that dispenses hearing instruments is responsible under this chapter for all transactions made in the establishment name or conducted on its premises by agents or persons employed by the establishment engaged in fitting and dispensing of hearing instruments. Every establishment that fits and dispenses shall have in its employ at least one licensed hearing aid specialist or licensed audiologist at all times, and shall annually submit proof that all testing equipment at that establishment that is required by the board to be calibrated has been properly calibrated.

(2) Effective January 1, 2003, no person shall engage in the practice of audiology or imply or represent that he or she is engaged in the practice of audiology unless he or she is a licensed audiologist or holds an audiology interim permit issued by the department as provided in this chapter. Audiologists who are certified as educational staff associates by the Washington professional educator standards board are excluded unless they elect to become licensed under this chapter. However, a person certified by the state board of education as an educational staff associate who practices outside the school setting must be a licensed audiologist.

(3) Effective January 1, 2003, no person shall engage in the practice of speech-language pathology or imply or represent that he or she is engaged in the practice of speech-language pathology unless he or she is a licensed speech-language pathologist or holds a speech-language pathology interim permit issued by the department as provided in this chapter. Speech-language pathologists who are certified as educational staff associates by the state board of education are excluded unless they elect to become licensed under this chapter. However, a person certified by the state board of education as an educational staff associate who practices outside the school setting must be a licensed speech-language pathologist.

[ 2014 c 189 s 3; 2006 c 263 s 801; 2005 c 45 s 2; 2002 c 310 s 2; 1998 c 142 s 2; 1996 c 200 s 3; 1989 c 198 s 1; 1983 c 39 s 2; 1973 1st ex.s c 106 s 2.]

NOTES:

Work group—2014 c 189: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Effective date—2002 c 310: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Effective date—1998 c 142 ss 1-14 and 16-20: See note following RCW 18.35.010.